California statutes. Public Resources Code
 described, the watershed is composed of all or parts of the Cities of Inglewood, Hawthorne, El Segundo, and Manhattan Beach, and unincorporated areas of Del Aire, Lennox, and Westmont.

(b) “Board” means the governing board of the Baldwin Hills and Urban Watersheds Conservancy.

(c) “Conservancy” means the Baldwin Hills and Urban Watersheds Conservancy.

(d) “Fund” means the Baldwin Hills Conservancy and Urban Watersheds Fund created pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 32574.

(e) “Nonprofit organization” means an exempt organization under Section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code.

(f) “Territory” means the land in the Baldwin Hills, southern Ballona Creek Watershed, and Upper
 Dominguez Channel area that is under the jurisdiction of the conservancy.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 714, Sec. 4.   (SB 1052)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 3. Conservancy [32555. - 32561.]

32555.

There is in the Natural Resources Agency, the Baldwin Hills and Urban Watersheds Conservancy, which is created for the following purposes:

(a) To acquire and manage public lands within the Baldwin Hills, southern Ballona Creek Watershed, and Upper Dominguez Channel area, and to provide recreational, open space, wildlife habitat restoration and protection, and lands for educational uses within the area.

(b) To acquire lands for open space within the territory of the conservancy.

(c) To provide for the public’s enjoyment, and to enhance the recreational and educational experience on public lands in the territory in a
 manner consistent with the protection of lands and resources in the area.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 714, Sec. 5.   (SB 1052)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

32556.

(a) The board shall consist of 15 voting members and 12 nonvoting members.

(b) The 15 voting members of the board shall consist of the following:

(1) The Secretary of the Natural Resources Agency, or the secretary’s designee.

(2) The Director of Parks and Recreation, or the director’s designee.

(3) The Director of Finance, or the director’s designee.

(4) The Director of the Los Angeles County Department of Parks and Recreation, or the director’s designee.

(5) The Mayor of the City of Los Angeles, or the mayor’s designee.

(6) The Mayor of the City of Culver City, or the mayor’s designee.

(7) An appointee from the South Bay Cities Council of Governments.

(8) A member of the Los Angeles County Board of Supervisors representing District 2, or the member’s designee.

(9) Five members of the public appointed by the Governor who are residents of Los Angeles County, as nominated by a city council or a neighborhood empowerment group, and who represent the diversity of the community surrounding the Baldwin Hills, southern Ballona Creek Watershed, and Upper Dominguez Channel area.

(10) A resident of Los Angeles County appointed by the
 Speaker of the Assembly, and a resident of Los Angeles County appointed by the Senate Committee on Rules.

(c) The 12 nonvoting members shall consist of the following:

(1) The Secretary for Environmental Protection, or the secretary’s designee.

(2) The Executive Officer of the State Coastal Conservancy, or the executive officer’s designee.

(3) The Executive Officer of the State Lands Commission, or the executive officer’s designee.

(4) An appointee of the Governor with experience in developing contaminated sites, commonly referred to as “brownfields.”

(5) The Executive Director of the Santa Monica Mountains Conservancy, or the
 executive director’s designee.

(6) The Director of the Culver City Human Services Department, or the director’s designee.

(7) The Director of the Los Angeles County Department of Public Works, or the director’s designee.

(8) The Director of the City of Los Angeles Department of Recreation and Parks, or the director’s designee.

(9) The Director of the City of Inglewood Parks, Recreation and Community Services Department or the Director of the City of Inglewood Public Works Department, or their designee.

(10) The President of the Board of Airport Commissioners of Los Angeles World Airports, or the president’s designee.

(11) The
 Director of the City of Los Angeles Department of Public Works, or the director’s designee.

(12) The Director of Conservation, or the director’s designee.

(d) A quorum shall consist of eight voting members of the board, and any action of the board affecting any matter before the board shall be decided by a majority vote of the voting members present, a quorum being present. However, the affirmative vote of at least five of the voting members of the board shall be required for the transaction of any business of the board.

(e) The board shall do both of the following:

(1) Study the potential environmental and recreational uses of Ballona Creek and the adjacent property described in subdivision (a) of Section 32553.

(2) Develop a proposed map for that area.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 714, Sec. 6.   (SB 1052)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

32557.

(a) The voting members of the board shall serve for two-year terms. Any vacancy on the board shall be filled within 60 days from its occurrence by the appointing authority.

(b) A person shall not continue as a member of the board if that person ceases to hold the office that qualifies that person for board membership. Upon the occurrence of that event, that person’s membership on the board shall automatically terminate.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 223, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

32558.

The chairperson and vice-chairperson of the board shall be selected by a majority of the voting members of the board for one-year terms.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 428, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

32559.

The conservancy may employ an executive officer and other staff to perform those functions that cannot be provided by volunteers.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 428, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

32560.

All meetings of the board shall be subject to the requirements of the Bagley-Keene Open Meeting Act (Article 9 (commencing with Section 11120) of Chapter 1 of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 223, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

32561.

All members shall receive reimbursement for actual, necessary, and reasonable expenses. Any member of the board who is not a full-time public employee shall be compensated at a rate not to exceed one hundred dollars ($100) per regular meeting, not to exceed 12 regular meetings a year. Any member of the board may waive compensation.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 428, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 4. Powers and Duties [32565. - 32579.]

32565.

The jurisdiction of the conservancy shall include only those lands or other areas that are donated to, or otherwise acquired by, or are operated by the conservancy, that are located in the Baldwin Hills, southern Ballona Creek Watershed, and Upper Dominguez Channel area.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 714, Sec. 7.   (SB 1052)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

32565.5.

The conservancy shall do all of the following:

(a) Develop and coordinate an integrated program of resource stewardship so that the entire Baldwin Hills, southern Ballona Creek Watershed, and Upper Dominguez Channel area is managed for optimum climate resilience and recreational and natural resource values based upon the needs and desires of the surrounding community.

(b) Establish policies and priorities within the Baldwin Hills, southern Ballona Creek Watershed, and Upper Dominguez Channel area, and conduct any necessary planning activities in accordance with the purposes set forth in Section 32555.

(c) Give priority to related projects that create
 expanded opportunities that provide recreation, aesthetic improvement, and wildlife habitat in the Baldwin Hills, southern Ballona Creek Watershed, and Upper Dominguez Channel area.

(d) Carry out projects and activities to further the purposes of this division throughout the region and, in doing so, the board shall make every effort to ensure that, over time, conservancy funding and other efforts are spread equitably across each of the various subregions and among the stated goal areas, with adequate allowance for the variability of costs associated with individual regions and types of projects.

(e) Study the potential environmental and recreational uses of the Baldwin Hills, southern Ballona Creek Watershed, and Upper Dominguez Channel area.

(f) (1) Develop and adopt a proposed watershed and
 open-space plan for improvements in the conservancy territory.

(2) (A) A report on the plan shall be provided to the Legislature on or before January 1, 2026.

(B) A report submitted pursuant to this paragraph shall be submitted in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code.

(C) This paragraph shall become inoperative on January 1, 2030, pursuant to Section 10231.5 of the Government
 Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 78, Sec. 1.   (SB 835)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

32566.

The conservancy may direct the management, operation, administration, and maintenance of the lands and facilities it acquires in accordance with the purposes set forth in Section 32555. The conservancy may adopt regulations governing the use by the public of conservancy lands and facilities and may provide for the enforcement of those regulations.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 428, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

32567.

The conservancy shall determine acquisition priorities and may acquire real property or any interest in real property within the Baldwin Hills, southern Ballona Creek Watershed, and Upper Dominguez Channel area from willing sellers and at fair market value or on other mutually acceptable terms, upon a finding that the acquisition is consistent with the purposes of the conservancy. The conservancy may acquire the property itself, or may coordinate the acquisition with other public agencies with appropriate responsibility and available funding or land to exchange. The overall objectives of the land acquisition program shall be to assist in accomplishing land transactions that are mutually beneficial to the landowners and the conservancy, and that meet the conservancy’s purposes. Neither the conservancy nor the
 State Public Works Board shall exercise the power of eminent domain for the purposes of this division. The conservancy shall have the first right of refusal to acquire, at the cost of acquisition, surplus public lands suitable for park and open space within the conservancy’s territory, and may accept private or public lands offered for recreational trails.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 714, Sec. 9.   (SB 1052)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

32568.

(a) The conservancy may, within the Baldwin Hills, southern Ballona Creek Watershed, and Upper Dominguez Channel area, undertake site improvement projects; regulate public access; revegetate and otherwise rehabilitate degraded areas, in consultation with other public agencies with appropriate jurisdiction and expertise; upgrade deteriorating facilities; and construct new facilities as needed for outdoor recreation, nature appreciation and interpretation, and natural resource protection. These projects shall be directed by the conservancy and undertaken by other public agencies, with the conservancy providing overall coordination through setting priorities for projects and assuring uniformity of approach.

(b) The conservancy
 shall not, under any circumstances, extend the road designated as “Stocker Street” to Overland Avenue or to any street within the boundaries of the City of Culver City without the prior written approval of the city council.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 714, Sec. 10.   (SB 1052)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

32569.

(a) The conservancy may award grants to local public agencies, state agencies, federal agencies, and nonprofit organizations for the purposes of this division.

(b) Grants to nonprofit organizations for the acquisition of real property or interests in real property shall be subject to all of the following conditions:

(1) The conservancy may acquire property at fair market value and consistent with the Property Acquisition Law (Part 11 (commencing with Section 15850) of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code), except that the acquisition price of lands acquired from public agencies may be based on the public agencies’ cost to acquire the land.

(2) The conservancy shall approve the terms under which the interest in land is acquired.

(3) The interest in land acquired pursuant to a grant from the conservancy may not be used as security for any debt incurred by the nonprofit organization unless the conservancy approves the transaction.

(4) The transfer of land acquired pursuant to a grant shall be subject to the approval of the conservancy and the execution of an agreement between the conservancy and the transferee sufficient to protect the interests of the conservancy.

(5) The conservancy shall have a right of entry and power of termination in and over all interests in real property acquired with state funds, which may be exercised if any essential term or condition of the grant is violated.

(6) If the existence of the nonprofit organization is terminated for any reason, title to all interest in real property acquired with state funds shall immediately vest in the conservancy, except that, prior to that termination, another public agency or nonprofit organization may receive title to all or a portion of that interest in real property, by recording its acceptance of title, together with the conservancy’s approval, in writing.

(c) Any deed or other instrument of conveyance whereby real property is acquired by a nonprofit organization pursuant to this section shall be recorded and shall set forth the executory interest or right of entry on the part of the conservancy.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 3, Sec. 8.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

32570.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the conservancy may lease, rent, sell, exchange, or otherwise transfer any real property or interest therein or option acquired under this division to a local public agency, state agency, federal agency, nonprofit organization, individual, or other entity for management purposes pursuant to terms and conditions approved by the conservancy. The conservancy may request the Director of General Services to undertake these actions on its behalf.

(b) The conservancy may initiate, negotiate, and participate in agreements for the management of land under its ownership or control with local public agencies, state agencies, federal agencies, nonprofit organizations, individuals, or other entities and may enter into any other agreements authorized by state or federal law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 3, Sec. 9.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

32571.

(a) Local public agencies may enter into an agreement to transfer responsibility for the management of the land located within the Baldwin Hills, southern Ballona Creek Watershed, and Upper Dominguez Channel area to the conservancy.

(b) Local public agencies shall retain exclusive authority over all zoning or land use regulations within their jurisdiction.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 714, Sec. 11.   (SB 1052)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

32572.

The conservancy shall restrict access on acquired lands that are unsuitable for parks and open-space use by entering into temporary agreements with other state or local public agencies for the protection of public health and safety, resource management and protection, and security.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 428, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

32573.

The conservancy shall do all of the following:

(a) Establish policies and priorities regarding the territory within the Baldwin Hills, southern Ballona Creek Watershed, and Upper Dominguez Channel area, and conduct any necessary planning activities in accordance with the purposes set forth in Section 32555.

(b) Give priority to related projects that create expanded opportunities that provide recreation, aesthetic improvement, and wildlife habitat in the Baldwin Hills, southern Ballona Creek Watershed, and Upper Dominguez Channel area.

(c) Approve conservancy-funded projects that advance the policies and priorities set
 forth in this division.

(d) Review the master plan required pursuant to subdivisions (b) and (c) of Section 1 of Chapter 752 of the Statutes of 1999 and implement prioritization for the acquisition and operation of additional recreational and open-space needs, including additional or upgraded facilities and parks that may be necessary or desirable.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 714, Sec. 12.   (SB 1052)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

32573.1.

(a) The Baldwin Hills, Southern Ballona Creek Watershed, and Upper Dominguez Channel Urban Watershed Improvement Program is hereby established, to be administered by the conservancy for climate change adaptation improvements, to protect, conserve, and restore the health and resilience of the watersheds and communities of the region, in support of the purposes and programs described in Section 32565.5. In implementing this program, the conservancy shall coordinate and collaborate with other state agencies, federal agencies, local entities, and stakeholders.

(b) In implementing this program, notwithstanding Section 32575, the conservancy may test new funding, policy, planning, and implementation approaches with the area covered by an initiative
 to test new ways of accomplishing the program objectives and goals described in subdivision (a), with the intent of broadening the scope of the initiative to apply to the entire program area.

(c) This section shall not be construed as requiring the Legislature to appropriate additional funds.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 714, Sec. 13.   (SB 1052)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

32574.

(a) The conservancy may fix and collect fees for the use of any land owned or controlled, or for any service provided, by the conservancy. No fee shall exceed the cost of maintaining and operating the land or of providing the service for which the fee is charged.

(b) The fee revenue and all other revenue received pursuant to this division shall be deposited in the Baldwin Hills and Urban Watersheds Conservancy Fund, which is hereby created in the State Treasury. The money in the fund shall be expended by the conservancy, upon appropriation by the Legislature, for the purposes of this division.

(c) Nothing in this act changes the Kenneth Hahn State Recreation
 Area’s status to receive funds as part of the state parks system.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 714, Sec. 14.   (SB 1052)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

32575.

The conservancy shall administer any funds appropriated to it, including any funds appropriated to it for these purposes from any future bond act or local initiative measure, and any revenue generated by public agencies for the Baldwin Hills, southern Ballona Creek Watershed, and Upper Dominguez Channel area and contributed to the conservancy, and may expend those funds for capital improvements, land acquisition, or support of the conservancy’s operations. Subject to Section 11005 of the Government Code, the conservancy may also accept any revenue, money, grants, goods, or services contributed to the conservancy by any public agency, private entity, or person, and, upon receipt, may expend any such revenue, money, or grants for capital improvements, land acquisitions, or support of the conservancy’s
 operations.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 714, Sec. 15.   (SB 1052)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

32576.

The conservancy may recruit and coordinate volunteers and experts to assist with conservancy projects and the maintenance of conservancy lands.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 428, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

32577.

The conservancy shall coordinate its actions with state and local public safety agencies.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 428, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

32578.

The conservancy shall have, and may exercise, all rights and powers, expressed or implied, necessary to carry out the purposes of this division, except as otherwise provided.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 428, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

32579.

The conservancy may sue and be sued.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 428, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------



======================================================================

DIVISION 22.8. SAN GABRIEL AND LOWER LOS ANGELES RIVERS AND MOUNTAINS CONSERVANCY [32600. - 32622.]



CHAPTER 1. General Provisions [32600. - 32602.]

32600.

This division shall be known, and may be cited, as the San Gabriel and Lower Los Angeles Rivers and Mountains Conservancy Act.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 789, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

32601.

The Legislature hereby finds and declares that the San Gabriel River and its tributaries, the lower Los Angeles River and its tributaries, the San Gabriel Mountains, Puente Hills, San Jose Hills, Santa Catalina Island, and the Dominguez Channel watershed constitute a unique and important open-space, environmental, anthropological, cultural, scientific, educational, recreational, scenic, and
 wildlife resource that should be held in trust to be preserved and enhanced for the enjoyment of, and appreciation by, present and future generations.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 718, Sec. 1.   (SB 1122)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

32602.

There is in the Natural Resources Agency the San Gabriel and Lower Los Angeles Rivers and Mountains Conservancy, which is created as a state agency for the following purposes:

(a) To acquire and manage public lands within the lower Los Angeles River and San Gabriel River watersheds, the Dominguez Channel watershed, and Santa Catalina Island, and to provide for open-space, low-impact recreational and educational uses, water conservation, watershed improvement, wildlife and habitat restoration and protection, and watershed
 improvement within the territory.

(b) To preserve the San Gabriel River and the lower Los Angeles River, the Dominguez Channel watershed, and Santa Catalina Island consistent with existing and adopted river and flood control projects for the protection of life and property.

(c) To acquire open-space lands within the territory of the conservancy.

(d) To provide for the public’s enjoyment and enhancement of recreational and educational experiences on public lands in the San Gabriel Watershed and lower Los Angeles River, the San Gabriel Mountains, the Dominguez
 Channel watershed, and Santa Catalina Island in a manner consistent with the protection of lands and resources in those watersheds.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 718, Sec. 2.   (SB 1122)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 2. Definitions [32603. - 32603.]

32603.

As used in this division, the following terms have the following meanings:

(a) “Board” means the governing board of the San Gabriel and Lower Los Angeles Rivers and Mountains Conservancy.

(b) “Conservancy” means the San Gabriel and Lower Los Angeles Rivers and Mountains Conservancy. The conservancy may also be known as the Rivers and Mountains Conservancy.

(c) (1) “Territory” means the territory of the conservancy that consists of those portions of the Counties of Los Angeles and Orange located within the San Gabriel River and
 its tributaries, the lower Los Angeles River and its tributaries, the San Gabriel Mountains, the Dominguez Channel watershed, and Santa Catalina Island, including, without limitation, all of the following:

(A) The hydrologic basin or watershed that coincides with the upper San Gabriel River watershed, including the Upper Rio Hondo tributary, but not including any land area within the Santa Monica Mountains Conservancy as described in Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 33100) and Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 33200) of Division 23. The hydrologic basin or watershed is bounded by the San Gabriel Mountains to the north, the San Jose Hills to the east, the Puente Hills to the
 south, and by a series of hills and the Raymond Fault to the west.

(B) The hydrologic basin or watershed that coincides with the lower San Gabriel River watershed.

(C) The San Gabriel Mountains, including the Foothills Mountains Conservancy and the Puente Hills and San Jose Hills area, except any land area within the Santa Monica Mountains Conservancy as described in Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 33100) and Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 33200) of Division 23.

(D) The hydrologic basin or watershed that coincides with the lower Los Angeles River south of the northernmost boundary of the City of Vernon, as of June 1, 1999, except any land area within the Santa Monica Mountains Conservancy, as described in
 Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 33100) and Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 33200) of Division 23.

(E) The hydrologic basin or watershed that coincides with the Dominguez Channel watershed bounded by Manchester Boulevard in the City of Inglewood to the north and the Los Angeles and Long Beach Harbors to the south.

(F) Santa Catalina Island, including the City of Avalon and unincorporated areas on the island.

(2) To assist persons in understanding the breadth of the territory included within the territory described in paragraph (1), the Legislature declares that that territory includes the territory in all of the following cities and areas:

(A) The territory within the city or community boundaries, as of January 1, 2022, of the following cities and communities: Alhambra, Anaheim, Arcadia, Artesia, Avalon, Azusa, Baldwin Park, Bell, Bell Gardens, Bellflower, Bradbury, Buena Park, Carson, Cerritos, Claremont, Commerce, Compton, Covina, Cudahy, Cypress, Diamond Bar, Downey, Duarte, El Monte, Fullerton, Gardena, Glendora, Hawaiian Gardens, Hawthorne, Hermosa Beach, Huntington Park, Industry, Irwindale, La Habra, La Habra Heights, La Mirada, La Palma, La Puente, La Verne, Lakewood, Lawndale, Long Beach, Los Alamitos, Lynwood, Maywood, Monrovia, Montebello, Monterey Park, Norwalk, Palos Verdes Estates, Paramount, Pico Rivera, Pomona,
 Rosemead, San Dimas, San Gabriel, San Pedro, Santa Fe Springs, Seal Beach, Signal Hill, South El Monte, South Gate, Temple City, Vernon, Walnut, West Covina, Whittier, Willowbrook, and Wilmington.

(B) Portions of the following cities and communities that fall within the definition of territory described in paragraph (1): Brea, El Segundo, Los Angeles, Inglewood, Placentia, Redondo Beach, Rolling Hills, Rolling Hills Estates, and Torrance.

(C) The unincorporated areas of the Counties of Los Angeles and Orange adjacent to the San Gabriel River and its tributaries, the lower Los Angeles River and its tributaries, the Dominguez Channel watershed, Santa Catalina Island, the San Gabriel Mountains, the Foothill Mountains, the Puente Hills, and the San Jose Hills area
 including, but not limited to, East Los Angeles.

(d) Nothing in this section shall affect the jurisdiction of any other state conservancy.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 718, Sec. 3.   (SB 1122)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 3. Conservancy [32604. - 32609.]

32604.

The conservancy shall do all of the following:

(a) Establish policies and priorities for the conservancy regarding the San Gabriel River and the lower Los Angeles River, and their watersheds, and conduct any necessary planning activities, in accordance with the purposes set forth in Section 32602.

(b) Give priority to river related projects that create expanded opportunities for recreation, greening, aesthetic improvement, and wildlife habitat along the corridor of the river, and in parts of the river channel that can be improved for the above purposes without infringing on water quality, water supply, and
 necessary flood control.

(c) Approve conservancy funded projects that advance the policies and priorities set forth in Section 32602.

(d) Prepare a San Gabriel and Lower Los Angeles Parkway and Open Space Plan to be approved by a majority of the cities representing a majority of the population, the Board of Supervisors of Los Angeles County, the Central Basin Water Association, and the San Gabriel Valley Water Association. The plan shall include, but not be limited to, all of the following elements:

(1) A determination of the policies and priorities for the conservation of the San Gabriel River and its watershed, the lower Los Angeles River, and the San Gabriel Mountains, in accordance with the purposes of the
 conservancy as set forth in Section 32602.

(2) A plan for incorporating, as relevant, the principles and planning work contained within the Los Angeles River Master Plan prepared by the County of Los Angeles.

(3) An identification of underused existing public open spaces and recommendations for providing better public use and enjoyment in areas identified in the plan.

(4) An identification of, and a priority program for implementing, those additional low-impact recreational and open space needs, including additional or upgraded facilities and parks that may be necessary or desirable.

(e) Update the San Gabriel and Lower Los Angeles Parkway and Open
 Space Plan to include the priorities for conservation and enhanced public use within the Dominguez Channel watershed and Santa Catalina Island.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 718, Sec. 4.   (SB 1122)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

32605.

The board shall consist of 15 voting members and 9 ex officio, nonvoting members, as follows:

(a) The 15 voting members of the board shall be the following:

(1) One member of the Board of Supervisors of the County of Los Angeles, or his or her designee, who represents the area or a portion thereof contained within the territory of the conservancy, appointed by the Governor.

(2) Two members of the Governing Board of the San Gabriel Valley Council of Governments, one of whom shall be a mayor or city council member of a city bordering along the San Gabriel River, and one of whom shall be a mayor or city council member of a city bordering the San Gabriel Mountains
 area. One member shall be appointed by a majority of the membership of that governing board, and one member shall be appointed by the Senate Committee on Rules from a list of two or more potential members submitted by the governing board. If the governing board fails to provide to the Senate Committee on Rules a list of two or more potential members, at least 30 days prior to the date a current member’s term of office expires, the Senate Committee on Rules may appoint a mayor or city council member of a city bordering along the San Gabriel River or the San Gabriel Mountains, or a member of the public who resides within the territory of the conservancy.

(3) Two members of the Board of Directors of the Gateway Cities Council of Governments, one of whom shall be the mayor of the City of Long Beach or a city council member of the City of Long Beach appointed by the mayor, and one of whom shall be appointed by the Speaker of the Assembly from a list
 of two or more potential members submitted by the executive committee of the Board of Directors of the Gateway Cities Council of Governments. The executive committee shall submit lists of potential members to the Speaker of the Assembly until an acceptable member is appointed.

(4) Two members of the Orange County Division of the League of California Cities, both of whom shall be a mayor or city council member of a city bordering along the San Gabriel River or a tributary thereof. One member shall be appointed by a majority of the membership of the city selection committee of Orange County, and one member shall be appointed by the Governor from a list of two or more potential members submitted by the city selection committee.

(5) One member shall be a representative of a member of the San Gabriel Valley Water Association appointed by a majority of the membership of the board of
 directors of the San Gabriel Valley Water Association.

(6) One member shall be a representative of the Central Basin Water Association appointed by a majority of the membership of the board of directors of the Central Basin Water Association.

(7) One member shall be a resident of Los Angeles County appointed by the Governor from a list of potential members submitted by local, state, and national environmental organizations that operate within the County of Los Angeles and within the territory of the conservancy and that have participated in planning for river restoration or open space, or both, or river preservation.

(8) One member, appointed by the Governor, who is a resident of a city, not otherwise represented on the board at the time of the member’s appointment, bordering the Lower Los Angeles River. The Governor
 shall make the appointment from a list of two or more potential members submitted by the executive committee of the Board of Directors of the Gateway Cities Council of Governments. The executive committee shall submit lists of potential members to the Governor until he or she appoints a member.

(9) One member, appointed by the Governor, who is a resident of a city, not otherwise represented on the board at the time of the member’s appointment, bordering the San Gabriel River. The Governor shall make the appointment from a list of two or more potential members submitted to the Governing Board of the San Gabriel Valley Council of Governments. The governing board shall submit lists of potential members to the Governor until he or she appoints a member.

(10) The Secretary of the Natural Resources Agency, or his or her designee.

(11) The Secretary for Environmental Protection, or his or her designee.

(12) The Director of Finance, or his or her designee.

(b) (1) Seven of the ex officio, nonvoting members shall be the following officers or an employee of each agency designated annually by that officer to represent the office or agency:

(A) The District Engineer of the United States Army Corps of Engineers.

(B) The Regional Forester for the Pacific Southwest Region of the United States Forest Service.

(C) The Director of the Los Angeles County Department of Public Works.

(D) The Director of the Orange County Public
 Facility and Resource Department.

(E) A member of the San Gabriel River Watermaster, appointed by a majority of the members of the San Gabriel River Watermaster.

(F) The Director of Parks and Recreation.

(G) The Executive Officer of the Wildlife Conservation Board.

(2) (A) Two of the ex officio, nonvoting members shall be the following:

(i) One Member of the Senate, appointed by the Senate Committee on
 Rules.

(ii) One Member of the Assembly, appointed by the Speaker of the Assembly.

(B) A member appointed pursuant to this paragraph shall meet with the conservancy and participate in its activities to the extent that participation is compatible with his or her duties as a legislator.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 677, Sec. 1.   (SB 355)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

32606.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (c), the term of each voting member of the board shall be two years. Any vacancy shall be filled within 60 days of its occurrence by the appointing authority.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), no person shall continue as a member of the board if he or she ceases to hold the office that qualifies that person to be appointed as a member of the board, or in the case of the member appointed pursuant to paragraph (5) or (6) of subdivision (a)
 of Section 32605, ceases to represent a member of the association. The membership on the board held by the person shall terminate immediately upon ceasing to hold that qualifying office or membership. Except as provided in subdivision (c), the position of any member appointed by the Governor shall be deemed vacant immediately if the member ceases to be a resident of the applicable territory.

(c) The term of each of the members appointed pursuant to paragraphs (2) and (3) of subdivision (a) of Section 32605 shall be two years, or until the member’s successor is appointed, whichever is longer.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 789, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

32607.

(a) The voting members of the board shall elect a chairperson, vice chairperson, and other officers, as determined to be necessary, from among the board members. The terms of those offices shall be determined by the board.

(b) The conservancy may employ an executive officer and other necessary staff to perform functions that cannot be provided by the existing personnel, by others on a contract basis, or by volunteers, and may enter into contracts for services requiring knowledge,
 experience, and ability not possessed by the conservancy staff. All those contracts shall be approved by the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 789, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

32608.

Members of the board who are not full-time public employees shall be compensated at a rate not to exceed seventy-five dollars ($75) per regular meeting, not to exceed 12 regular meetings per year, and the actual and necessary expenses incurred in the performance of their duties. Any member may waive compensation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 789, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

32609.

(a) A quorum shall consist of a majority of the voting members of the board. All meetings of the board shall be held in accordance with the Bagley-Keene Open Meetings Act (Article 9 (commencing with Section 11120) of Chapter 1 of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code).

(b) Any action of the board affecting any matter shall be taken by a majority vote of the membership of the board, a quorum being present.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 789, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 4. Powers and Duties [32611. - 32616.]

32611.
